Utah statutes.
79-3-501.   Permit required to excavate critical paleontological resources
on state lands -- Removal of specimen or site.
(1) (a)  Before excavating for critical paleontological resources on lands
owned or controlled by the state or its subdivisions, except as provided in
Section 79-3-502, a person must obtain a permit from the survey.
(b)  Application for a permit shall be made on a form furnished by the survey.
(c)  The survey shall make rules for the issuance of permits specifying or
requiring:
(i)  the minimum permittee qualifications;
(ii)  the duration of the permit;
(iii)  proof of permission from the land owner that the permittee may enter
the property for purposes specified in the permit;
(iv)  research designs that provide for the maximum recovery of scientific,
paleontological, and educational information, in addition to the physical
recovery of specimens and the reporting of paleontological information meeting
current standards of scientific rigor;
(v)  the need, if any, to submit data obtained in the course of field
investigations to the survey;
(vi)  proof of consultation with the designated museum representative
regarding curation of collections;
(vii)  proof of consultation with other agencies that  may manage other legal
interests in the land; and
(viii)  other information the survey considers necessary.
(2)  All paleontological work shall be carried out under the supervision of
the director, or assigned staff.
(3)  A person may not remove from the state, prior to placement in a
repository or curation facility, a specimen, site, or portion of a specimen or
site from lands owned or controlled by the state or its subdivisions, except
as provided in Section 79-3-502, without permission from the survey, and
without prior consultation with the landowner or other agencies managing other
interests in the land.
